North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 1. Investment and Deposit of Trust Funds. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-1 through 36A-7.
[Transferred]

Recodified as §§ 32-70 through 32-76 by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to trusts and trustees, see Chapter 36C, the Uniform Trust Code,

G.S. 36C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to recodification of this Article, G.S. 36A-8 through 36A-12 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.